Hawaii statutes.
§514A-20 Condominium property regimes.
Whenever the sole owner or all of the owners including all of the lessees of a
property expressly declare, through the execution and recordation of a master
deed, together with a declaration, which declaration shall set forth the
particulars enumerated by section 514A-11, the sole owner's or their desire to
submit the property to the regime established by this chapter, there shall
thereby be established a condominium property regime with respect to the
property, and this chapter shall be applicable to the property. If the master
deed is already recorded, the recordation of the declaration is sufficient to
achieve the same result. [L 1977, c 98, pt of §2; gen ch 1985; am L 1988, c 65,
§2]

Case Notes

Regime; when created. 50 H. 540, 445 P.2d 109.

Effect of declaration. 62 H. 188, 613 P.2d 1315.

Leases encumbering the property are an integral part of the
horizontal property regime. 7 H. App. 60, 742 P.2d 974.

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next